cs: Forma konzervovaného masa: Slaninové kousky; Corned beef; Plátky šunky; Lančmít; Masová vata; Trhané vepřové maso; Paštika; Rillettes; Terina; Vídeňské párky; Jiná
nl: Ingeblikt vlees vorm: Spekjes; Cornedbeef; Hamplakken; Lunchworst; Vleespluis; Pulled pork; Paté; Rillettes; Terrine; Weense worstjes; Overig
el: Μορφή κονσερβοποιημένου κρέατος: Κομματάκια μπέικον; Κορν μπιφ; Φέτες ζαμπόν; Luncheon meat; Αφράτο κρέας (meat floss); Μαδημένο χοιρινό (pulled pork); Πατέ; Rillettes; Τερίν; Λουκάνικο Βιέννης; Άλλο
hu: Húskonzerv formája: Szalonnapörc; Sózva pácolt marhahús (Corned beef); Sonkaszeletek; Löncshús; Húspolyh (Meat floss); Tépett sertéshús (Pulled pork); Pástétom; Rillettes; Terrine; Virsli (Bécsi); Egyéb
pl: Forma mięsa w puszce: Kawałki bekonu; Peklowana wołowina; Plastry szynki; Mielonka; Wata mięsna; Szarpana wieprzowina; Pasztet; Rillettes; Terrine; Kiełbaski wiedeńskie; Inne
pt-PT: Forma da carne enlatada: Pedaços de bacon; Corned beef; Fatias de fiambre; Fiambre em lata; Algodão de carne; Carne de porco desfiada; Paté; Rillettes; Terrina; Salsicha de Viena; Outro
hr-HR: Konzervirani oblik mesa: Komadići slanine; Usoljena govedina; Naresci šunke; Mesni doručak; Mesne niti; Trgana svinjetina; Pašteta; Rillettes; Terina; Bečka hrenovka; Ostalo
fi: Säilykelihamuoto: Pekonimurut; Suolaliha; Kinkkuviipaleet; Leikkeleliha; Lihafloss; Nyhtöpossu; Patee; Rillettes; Terriini; Wieninmakkarat; Muu
da: Type af dåsekød: Bacontern; Corned beef; Skinkeskiver; Frokostkød; Kødtråde (Meat floss); Pulled pork; Pâté; Rillettes; Terrin; Wienerpølse; Andet
zh-CN: 罐装肉: 培根碎; 咸牛肉; 火腿片; 午餐肉; 肉松; 手撕猪肉; 肉酱; 熟肉酱; 法式肉派; 维也纳香肠; 其他
it: forma di carne in scatola: Pancetta a cubetti; Corned beef; Fette di prosciutto; Carne in scatola; Sfilacci di carne; Pulled pork; Paté; Rillettes; Terrina; Salsiccia di Vienna; Altro
fr: Forme de la viande en conserve: Brisures de bacon; Corned-beef; Tranches de jambon; Pain de viande; Porc effiloché séché; Porc effiloché; Pâté; Rillettes; Terrine; Saucisse de Vienne; Autre
ko: 통조림 육류 형태: 베이컨 비트; 콘비프; 햄 슬라이스; 런천 미트; 미트 플로스; 풀드 포크; 파테; 리예트; 테린; 비엔나 소시지; 기타
vi: Thịt đóng hộp: Thịt lợn xông khói vụn; Thịt bò muối; Thịt nguội cắt lát; Thịt hộp; Ruốc thịt; Thịt lợn xé; Pate; Rillettes; Terrine; Xúc xích Vienna; Khác
de: Form der Fleischkonserve: Speckwürfel; Corned Beef; Schinkenscheiben; Frühstücksfleisch; Fleischwolle; Pulled Pork; Pastete; Rillettes; Terrine; Wiener Würstchen; Sonstige
pt-BR: Carne enlatada: Pedaços de bacon; Corned beef; Fatias de presunto; Fiambre; Carne desfiada seca; Carne de porco desfiada; Patê; Rillettes; Terrine; Salsicha de Viena; Outros
ru: Форма консервированного мяса: Кусочки бекона; Солонина; Ломтики ветчины; Консервированная ветчина; Мясная вата; Рваная свинина; Паштет; Рийет; Террин; Венские сосиски; Другое
es: Presentación de la carne enlatada: Trocitos de tocino; Corned beef; Rebanadas de jamón; Fiambre; Carne en hebras; Cerdo desmenuzado; Paté; Rillettes; Terrina; Salchicha de Viena; Otro
ro-RO: Formă carne în conservă: Bucățele de bacon; Corned beef; Felii de șuncă; Luncheon meat; Fibre de carne; Pulled pork; Pate; Rillettes; Terină; Crenvurști vienezi; Altele
sv: Konserverad köttform: Baconbitar; Corned beef; Skinkskivor; Luncheon meat; Meat floss; Pulled pork; Pastej; Rillette; Terrin; Wienerkorv; Övrigt
ja: 缶詰肉形状: ベーコンビッツ; コンビーフ; ハムスライス; ランチョンミート; 肉でんぶ; プルドポーク; パテ; リエット; テリーヌ; ウィンナーソーセージ; その他
lt-LT: Konservuotos mėsos forma: Šoninės gabalėliai; Sūdyta jautiena; Kumpio griežinėliai; Konservuota mėsa; Mėsos plaušeliai; Plėšyta kiauliena; Paštetas; Rijetai; Terinas; Vienos dešrelės; Kita
sl-SI: Oblika konzerviranega mesa: Koščki slanine; Nasoljena govedina; Rezine šunke; Mesni narezek; Mesne nitke; Trgana svinjina; Pašteta; Rillettes; Terina; Hrenovka; Drugo
bg-BG: Форма на консервираното месо: Парченца бекон; Осолено говеждо месо; Резени шунка; Месо за обяд; Месни конци (Meat floss); Дърпано свинско; Пастет; Рийет (Rillettes); Терин; Виенска наденица; Други
th: รูปแบบเนื้อกระป๋อง: เบคอนบิตส์; คอร์นบีฟ; แฮมสไลด์; ลันชอนมีท; เนื้อหยอง; พูลพอร์ค; ปาเต้; ริลเล็ตส์; เทอร์รีน; ไส้กรอกเวียนนา; อื่นๆ
nb: Hermetisk kjøttform: Baconbiter; Corned beef; Skinke i skiver; Lunsjkjøtt; Kjøttfloss; Pulled pork; Paté; Rillettes; Terrin; Wienerpølse; Annet
zh-TW: 肉類罐頭形式: 培根碎; 醃牛肉; 火腿片; 午餐肉; 肉鬆; 手撕豬肉; 肉醬; 熟肉醬; 法式肉派; 維也納香腸; 其他
en: Canned meat form: Bacon bits; Corned beef; Ham slices; Luncheon meat; Meat floss; Pulled pork; Pâté; Rillettes; Terrine; Vienna sausage; Other
sk-SK: Forma konzervovaného mäsa: Kúsky slaniny; Nasolené hovädzie mäso; Plátky šunky; Lanšmít; Mäsové vlákna (Rousong); Trhané bravčové; Paštéta; Rillettes; Terina; Viedenské párky; Iné
tr: Konserve et formu: Bacon parçacıkları; Konserve sığır eti; Jambon dilimleri; Konserve et; Kurutulmuş et lifi; Tiftiklenmiş domuz eti; Pate; Rillette; Terin; Viyana sosisi; Diğer